Colorado, session 2026A, HB1301.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
-2- HB26-1301

SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-302, add (3.9)
as follows:
24-75-302. Capital construction fund - capital assessment fees
- calculation - information technology capital account - repeal.
(3.9) (a) THE HOSPITAL SUPPORT ACCOUNT IS CREATED IN THE
CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION FUND. THE ACCOUNT CONSISTS OF GIFTS, GRANTS,
DONATIONS, AND MONEY TRANSFERRED BY THE STATE TREASURER TO THE
ACCOUNT PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 39-28.8-203 (1)(b)(II.8), 39-28.8-305
(1)(a)(V), AND 44-3-503 (1)(d.5)(II)(B) AND ANY OTHER MONEY THAT
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER TO THE FUND.
(b) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND
INCOME DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE
HOSPITAL SUPPORT ACCOUNT TO THE ACCOUNT.
(c) (I) SUBJECT TO ANNUAL APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES MAY EXPEND MONEY
FROM THE ACCOUNT IN THE FOLLOWING PRIORITY ORDER:
(A) FIRST, TO FUND THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE COLORADO
MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE AT AURORA CREATED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE
95 OF TITLE 27;
(B) SECOND, TO FUND THE OPERATIONAL EXPENSES ASSOCIATED
WITH THE FACILITY DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3.9)(c)(I)(A) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(C) THIRD, TO FUND THE OPERATIONAL EXPENSES ASSOCIATED
WITH LONG-TERM CIVIL COMMITMENT FACILITIES IN MESA COUNTY.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL SUBMIT
REQUESTS FOR APPROPRIATIONS FROM THE ACCOUNT FOR THE PURPOSES
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3.9)(c)(I)(A) OF THIS SECTION TO THE CAPITAL
-3- HB26-1301

DEVELOPMENT COMMITTEE AND, ONLY UPON APPROVAL BY THE CAPITAL
DEVELOPMENT COMMITTEE, MAY AN APPROPRIATION BE AUTHORIZED IN
THE ANNUAL GENERAL APPROPRIATION BILL, A SUPPLEMENTAL
APPROPRIATION BILL, OR ANOTHER BILL ENACTED BY THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY.
(d) THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL PROVIDE
DETAILS TO THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE NO LATER THAN THIRTY-FIVE
DAYS AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE FISCAL YEAR REGARDING THE TOTAL
BALANCE OF THE HOSPITAL SUPPORT ACCOUNT FOR THE PREVIOUS STATE
FISCAL YEAR.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 95 to title
27 as follows:
ARTICLE 95
Colorado Mental Health Institute at Aurora
27-95-101. Institute established.
(1) THERE IS ESTABLISHED THE COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH
INSTITUTE AT AURORA FOR THE TREATMENT AND CARE OF INDIVIDUALS
WHO MAY REQUIRE MEDICAL CARE AND TREATMENT WITHIN THE
CAPABILITIES OF THE STAFF AND FACILITIES OF THE INSTITUTE, AND:
(a) WHO MAY HAVE A BEHAVIORAL OR MENTAL HEALTH DISORDER
FROM ANY CAUSE;
(b) ARE IN STATE INSTITUTIONS ON AN INPATIENT OR OUTPATIENT
BASIS; OR
(c) ARE IN STATE PROGRAMS RELATING TO THE TREATMENT OF
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS.
(2) THE COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE AT AURORA
SHALL HAVE NO FEWER THAN FIFTY BEDS AND NO MORE THAN SEVENTY
-4- HB26-1301

BEDS AVAILABLE FOR THE TREATMENT AND CARE OF THE INDIVIDUALS
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) THE COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE AT AURORA IS
AUTHORIZED TO CONTRACT, PURSUANT TO THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT
PROCUREMENT PROCESS, WITH FEDERAL AGENCIES TO PROVIDE
PSYCHIATRIC, MEDICAL, AND SURGICAL SERVICES AT THE INSTITUTE TO
PERSONS UNDER THE CARE OF OR IN THE CUSTODY OR CONTROL OF AN
AGENCY OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, SO LONG AS THE PROVISION OF
SUCH SERVICES DOES NOT EXCEED THE CAPABILITIES OF THE STAFF AND
FACILITIES OF THE INSTITUTE AND DOES NOT PREEMPT SERVICES TO STATE
PATIENTS.
27-95-102. Capacity to take property.
THE COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE AT AURORA IS
AUTHORIZED TO RECEIVE GIFTS, LEGACIES, DEVISES, AND CONVEYANCES
OF PROPERTY, REAL OR PERSONAL, THAT MAY BE MADE, GIVEN, OR
GRANTED TO OR FOR THE COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE AT
AURORA. THE CHIEF OFFICER OF THE INSTITUTE, WITH THE APPROVAL OF
THE GOVERNOR, SHALL MAKE DISPOSITION OF SUCH GIFTS OR PROPERTY AS
MAY BE FOR THE BEST INTEREST OF THE COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH
INSTITUTE AT AURORA.
27-95-103. Employees - adult protective services data system
check - publications.
(1) THE HEAD OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE DIVISION OVERSEEING THE
COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE AT AURORA SHALL APPOINT OR
EMPLOY, PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OF ARTICLE XII OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION, ADMINISTRATORS, PHYSICIANS, NURSES, ATTENDANTS,
AND ADDITIONAL EMPLOYEES AS NECESSARY FOR THE PROPER CONDUCT
-5- HB26-1301

OF THE INSTITUTE. THE HEAD OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE DIVISION MAY
CONTRACT WITH THE BOARD OF REGENTS OF THE UNIVERSITY OF
COLORADO HEALTH SCIENCES CENTER OR ANY OTHER GOVERNING BOARD
OF A STATE-SUPPORTED INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION FOR THE
PROVISION OF SERVICES BY PHYSICIANS AND OTHER HEALTH-CARE
PRACTITIONERS WHEN DEEMED NECESSARY FOR THE PROPER CONDUCT OF
THE INSTITUTE. DURING THE PERFORMANCE OF ANY DUTIES BY THE
PHYSICIANS AND OTHER HEALTH-CARE PRACTITIONERS FOR THE
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES, THE PHYSICIANS AND OTHER
HEALTH-CARE PRACTITIONERS ARE "PUBLIC EMPLOYEES", AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 24-10-103 (4), AND THE LIMITATIONS OF SECTION 24-30-1517 (2)
DO NOT APPLY.
(1.5) THE HEAD OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE DIVISION OVERSEEING
THE COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE AT AURORA SHALL, PRIOR TO
EMPLOYMENT, SUBMIT THE NAME OF A PERSON WHO WILL BE PROVIDING
DIRECT CARE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 26-3.1-101 (3.5), TO AN AT-RISK
ADULT, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 26-3.1-101 (1.5), AS WELL AS ANY OTHER
REQUIRED IDENTIFYING INFORMATION, TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN
SERVICES FOR A CHECK OF THE COLORADO ADULT PROTECTIVE SERVICES
DATA SYSTEM PURSUANT TO SECTION 26-3.1-111 TO DETERMINE IF THE
PERSON IS SUBSTANTIATED IN A CASE OF MISTREATMENT OF AN AT-RISK
ADULT.
(2) PUBLICATIONS OF THE COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE
AT AURORA CIRCULATED IN QUANTITY OUTSIDE THE INSTITUTE ARE
SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL AND CONTROL OF THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR
OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES.
27-95-104. Authorized utilization of medical facilities at
-6- HB26-1301

institute - equipment replacement fund.
(1) A PERSON COMMITTED TO THE CUSTODY OF OR CARED FOR IN
THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES OR THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS WHO REQUIRES MEDICAL CARE AND TREATMENT THAT CAN
BE ADVANTAGEOUSLY TREATED BY PSYCHIATRIC, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL
CARE AVAILABLE AT THE COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE AT
AURORA MAY BE TREATED AT THE INSTITUTE. CHARGES FOR PATIENT
CARE AND TREATMENT SHALL BE MADE IN THE MANNER PROVIDED IN
ARTICLE 92 OF THIS TITLE 27. THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL MAKE A
SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION ANNUALLY FOR THE GENERAL MEDICAL DIVISION
OF THE COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE AT AURORA BASED ON
PROJECTIONS OF THE TOTAL PATIENT LOAD AND ASSOCIATED COSTS FROM
ALL INSTITUTIONS, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL
DETERMINE AT LEAST ANNUALLY THE PER DIEM EXPENSES AND THE
ACTUAL USE OF THE GENERAL MEDICAL DIVISION BY EACH INSTITUTION,
INCLUDING OTHER DIVISIONS OF THE COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH
INSTITUTE AT AURORA.
(2) A PERSON UNDER THE CARE OF OR IN THE CUSTODY OR
CONTROL OF AN AGENCY OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT WHOSE
PSYCHIATRIC, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL NEEDS COULD BE
ADVANTAGEOUSLY TREATED AT THE COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH
INSTITUTE AT AURORA MAY BE TREATED AT THE INSTITUTE PURSUANT TO
A CONTRACT BETWEEN THE INSTITUTE AND THE AGENCY OF THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT.
(3) (a) A CONTRACT ENTERED INTO PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)
OF THIS SECTION MUST COVER THE FULL DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS OF
SERVICES AS DETERMINED BY GENERALLY ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING
-7- HB26-1301

PRINCIPLES AND MUST INCLUDE A FEE TO COVER THE NEED FOR
REPLACEMENT OF EXISTING EQUIPMENT, WHICH WOULD OCCUR BECAUSE
OF THIS ADDITIONAL USE. THE COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE AT
AURORA SHALL COLLECT ALL FEES IMPOSED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (3)(a) AND TRANSMIT THOSE FEES TO THE STATE TREASURER,
WHO SHALL CREDIT THE SAME TO THE EQUIPMENT REPLACEMENT FUND,
WHICH IS CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY.
(b) THE EQUIPMENT REPLACEMENT FUND CONSISTS OF THE FEES
CREDITED BY THE STATE TREASURER TO THE FUND PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS SECTION AND ANY OTHER MONEY THAT THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER TO THE FUND.
SUBJECT TO ANNUAL APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, THE
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES MAY EXPEND MONEY FROM THE FUND
FOR REPLACEMENT OF EXISTING EQUIPMENT MADE NECESSARY PURSUANT
TO THIS SECTION.
27-95-105. Alternative uses for institute facilities.
THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL DETERMINE THE
EXISTENCE OF RESOURCES AT THE COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE
AT AURORA THAT ARE IN EXCESS OF THE NEEDS OF THE PRIMARY PURPOSE
OF THE INSTITUTE AND MAY MAKE AVAILABLE TO THE REGENTS OF THE
UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO, ON MUTUALLY AGREEABLE TERMS, A
MAXIMUM OF TEN BEDS AT THE INSTITUTE FOR THE PURPOSE OF TEACHING
STUDENTS IN THE FAMILY PRACTICE MEDICAL TRAINING PROGRAM
CONDUCTED BY AND UNDER THE CONTROL OF THE REGENTS. THE
RESOURCES SHALL BE A SUPPLEMENT TO ANY EXISTING HEALTH-CARE
RESOURCES AND ACADEMIC FACILITIES IN THE REGION.
27-95-106. Access to inpatient civil beds at institute.
-8- HB26-1301

THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT ADMISSION
CRITERIA THAT ENSURES INDIVIDUALS, PRIOR TO BEING ADMITTED, HAVE
BEEN EVALUATED FOR THE LEAST RESTRICTIVE LEVEL OF CARE AND THAT
GEOGRAPHIC LOCATION, CURRENT HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER, AND PAYER
TYPE ARE NOT THE PRIMARY DETERMINING FACTORS IN WHETHER AN
INDIVIDUAL HAS ACCESS TO A CIVIL INPATIENT BED.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-28.8-202, amend
(1)(a)(I); repeal (1)(b); and add (1)(c) as follows:
39-28.8-202. Retail marijuana sales tax.
(1) (a) (I) In addition to the tax imposed pursuant to part 1 of
article 26 of this title 39 and the sales tax imposed by a local government
pursuant to title 29, 30, 31, or 32, but except as otherwise set forth in
subsections (1)(a)(II) and (1)(a)(III) of this section, beginning January 1,
2014, and through June 30, 2017, there is imposed upon all sales of retail
marijuana and retail marijuana products by a retailer a tax at the rate of
ten percent of the amount of the sale. Beginning July 1, 2017, AND
THROUGH DECEMBER 31, 2026, there is imposed upon all sales of retail
marijuana and retail marijuana products by a retailer a tax at the rate of
fifteen percent of the amount of the sale. BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027,
THERE IS IMPOSED UPON ALL SALES OF RETAIL MARIJUANA AND RETAIL
MARIJUANA PRODUCTS BY A RETAILER A TAX AT THE RATE OF FIFTEEN AND
FORTY-TWO HUNDREDTHS PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT OF THE SALE. The tax
imposed by this section is computed in accordance with schedules or
forms prescribed by the executive director of the department; except that
a retail marijuana store is not allowed to retain any portion of the retail
marijuana sales tax collected pursuant to this part 2 to cover the expenses
of collecting and remitting the tax. The executive director may
-9- HB26-1301

promulgate rules to implement this section.
(b) The maximum tax rate that may be imposed pursuant to this
section is fifteen percent. At any time on or after January 1, 2014, the
general assembly may, by a bill enacted by the general assembly and that
becomes law:
(I) Establish a tax rate to be imposed pursuant to this subsection
(1) that is lower than fifteen percent of the sale of retail marijuana or
retail marijuana products; or
(II) After establishing a tax rate that is lower than fifteen percent
pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), increase the tax rate to
be imposed pursuant to this subsection (1); except that, in no event shall
the general assembly increase the tax rate above fifteen percent of the sale
of retail marijuana or retail marijuana products. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, an increase in the tax rate pursuant to this
subparagraph (II) shall not require voter approval subsequent to the voter
approval required pursuant to part 4 of this article.
(c) THE MAXIMUM TAX RATE THAT MAY BE IMPOSED PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION IS FIFTEEN AND FORTY-TWO HUNDREDTHS PERCENT. AT ANY
TIME ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY, BY
A BILL ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THAT BECOMES LAW:
(I) ESTABLISH A TAX RATE TO BE IMPOSED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (1) THAT IS LOWER THAN FIFTEEN AND FORTY-TWO
HUNDREDTHS PERCENT OF THE SALE OF RETAIL MARIJUANA OR RETAIL
MARIJUANA PRODUCTS; OR
(II) AFTER ESTABLISHING A TAX RATE THAT IS LOWER THAN
FIFTEEN AND FORTY-TWO HUNDREDTHS PERCENT PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (1)(c), INCREASE THE TAX RATE TO BE IMPOSED PURSUANT TO
-10- HB26-1301

THIS SUBSECTION (1); EXCEPT THAT, IN NO EVENT SHALL THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY INCREASE THE TAX RATE ABOVE FIFTEEN AND FORTY-TWO
HUNDREDTHS PERCENT OF THE SALE OF RETAIL MARIJUANA OR RETAIL
MARIJUANA PRODUCTS. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF
LAW, AN INCREASE IN THE TAX RATE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION
(1)(c)(II) SHALL NOT REQUIRE VOTER APPROVAL SUBSEQUENT TO THE
VOTER APPROVAL REQUIRED PURSUANT TO PART 4 OF THIS ARTICLE 28.8.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-28.8-203, amend
(1)(a)(I), (1)(b)(I.6) introductory portion, and (3); and add (1)(b)(II.7) and
(1)(b)(II.8) as follows:
39-28.8-203. Disposition of collections - definitions.
(1) The proceeds of all money collected from the retail marijuana
sales tax are initially credited to the old age pension fund created in
section 1 of article XXIV of the state constitution in accordance with
sections 2 (a) and 2 (f) of article XXIV of the state constitution and
thereafter are transferred to the general fund in accordance with section
7 of article XXIV of the state constitution. For each fiscal year in which
a tax is collected pursuant to this part 2, an amount shall be appropriated
or distributed from the general fund as follows:
(a) (I) Before July 1, 2017, an amount equal to fifteen percent of
the gross retail marijuana sales tax revenue collected by the department
is apportioned to local governments. On and after July 1, 2017, but before
July 1, 2025, an amount equal to ten percent of the gross retail marijuana
sales tax revenue collected by the department is apportioned to local
governments. On and after July 1, 2025, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027,
an amount equal to three and one-half percent of the gross retail
marijuana sales tax revenue collected by the department is apportioned to
-11- HB26-1301

local governments. ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, AN AMOUNT EQUAL
TO THREE AND ONE-HALF PERCENT OF THE GROSS ADJUSTED RETAIL
MARIJUANA SALES TAX REVENUE COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT IS
APPORTIONED TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS. The city or town share is
apportioned according to the percentage that retail marijuana sales tax
revenue collected by the department within the boundaries of the city or
town bear to the total retail marijuana sales tax revenue collected by the
department. The county share is apportioned according to the percentage
that retail marijuana sales tax revenue collected by the department in the
unincorporated area of the county bear to total retail marijuana sales tax
revenue collected by the department.
(b) (I.6) On and after July 1, 2025, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027,
of the ninety-six and one-half percent of the gross retail marijuana sales
tax revenue in the general fund remaining after the allocation to local
governments required by subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section is made, the
state treasurer shall retain fourteen and fifty-one one-hundredths percent
in the general fund for use for any lawful purpose and shall transfer from
the general fund:
(II.7) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, OF THE NINETY-SIX AND
ONE-HALF PERCENT OF THE ADJUSTED RETAIL MARIJUANA SALES TAX
REVENUE IN THE GENERAL FUND REMAINING AFTER THE ALLOCATION TO
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I) OF THIS
SECTION IS MADE, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL RETAIN FOURTEEN AND
FIFTY-ONE ONE-HUNDREDTHS PERCENT IN THE GENERAL FUND FOR USE
FOR ANY LAWFUL PURPOSE AND SHALL TRANSFER FROM THE GENERAL
FUND:
(A) SEVENTY-TWO AND TWO-TENTHS PERCENT TO THE MARIJUANA
-12- HB26-1301

TAX CASH FUND;
(B) ELEVEN AND SEVENTY-FOUR ONE-HUNDREDTHS PERCENT TO
THE STATE PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND CREATED IN SECTION 22-54-114 (1) FOR
USE AS SPECIFIED IN SECTION 22-54-139 (3); AND
(C) ONE AND FIFTY-FIVE ONE-HUNDREDTHS PERCENT TO THE
MARIJUANA CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 44-10-801 (1)(a).
(II.8) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, THE STATE TREASURER
SHALL TRANSFER AN AMOUNT FROM THE GENERAL FUND EQUAL TO THE
DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE TOTAL RETAIL MARIJUANA SALES TAX REVENUE
COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION AND THE
ADJUSTED RETAIL MARIJUANA SALES TAX REVENUE COLLECTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TO THE HOSPITAL SUPPORT
ACCOUNT CREATED IN SECTION 24-75-302 (3.9).
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "ADJUSTED RETAIL MARIJUANA SALES TAX REVENUE" MEANS
THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF SALES TAX REVENUE THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN
COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT IF A SALES TAX WERE IMPOSED UPON ALL
SALES OF RETAIL MARIJUANA AND RETAIL MARIJUANA PRODUCTS BY A
RETAILER AT THE RATE OF FIFTEEN PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT OF THE SALE
RATHER THAN FIFTEEN AND FORTY-TWO HUNDREDTHS PERCENT.
(a) (b) "Ballot issue" means the ballot issue referred to the voters
in accordance with section 39-28.8-603 (1).
(c) "TOTAL RETAIL MARIJUANA SALES TAX REVENUE" MEANS THE
TOTAL AMOUNT OF SALES TAX REVENUE COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(b)(d) "Marijuana tax cash fund" is the cash fund created in
section 39-28.8-501 (1).
-13- HB26-1301

SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 39-28.8-204
as follows:
39-28.8-204. Revenue and spending limitations.
Notwithstanding any limitations on revenue, spending, or
appropriations contained in section 20 of article X of the state constitution
or any other provision of law, any revenues generated by the retail
marijuana sales tax imposed pursuant to this part 2 as approved by the
voters at the statewide election ELECTIONS in November 2013 AND
NOVEMBER 2026, may be collected and spent as voter-approved revenue
changes and shall not require voter approval subsequent to the voter
approval required pursuant to part 4 of this article ARTICLE 28.8.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-28.8-302, amend
(1)(a)(I) and (2)(a); repeal (1)(b); and add (1)(b.5) as follows:
39-28.8-302. Retail marijuana - excise tax levied at first
transfer from retail marijuana cultivation facility - tax rate.
(1) (a) (I) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(b) or
(1)(c) of this section, there is levied and shall be collected, in addition to
the sales tax imposed pursuant to part 1 of article 26 of this title 39 and
part 2 of this article 28.8, a tax on the first sale or transfer of unprocessed
retail marijuana by a retail marijuana cultivation facility BEFORE JULY 1,
2027, at a rate of fifteen percent of the average market rate of the
unprocessed retail marijuana if the transaction is between affiliated retail
marijuana business licensees. Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(1)(b) or (1)(c) of this section, there is levied and shall be collected, in
addition to the sales tax imposed pursuant to part 1 of article 26 of this
title 39 and part 2 of this article 28.8, a tax on the first sale or transfer of
unprocessed retail marijuana by a retail marijuana cultivation facility
-14- HB26-1301

BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, at a rate of fifteen percent of the contract price for
unprocessed retail marijuana if the transaction is between unaffiliated
retail marijuana business licensees. BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, retail
marijuana excise tax shall also be calculated as fifteen percent of the
contract price when the first transfer of retail marijuana that has been
harvested for sale at a retail marijuana store or extraction by a retail
marijuana product manufacturing facility is between unaffiliated retail
marijuana cultivation facilities. ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, ANY TAX
DESCRIBED BY THIS SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I) SHALL BE LEVIED AND
COLLECTED AT A RATE OF FIFTEEN AND FORTY-TWO HUNDREDTHS, RATHER
THAN FIFTEEN, PERCENT. The tax shall be imposed at the time when the
retail marijuana cultivation facility first sells or transfers unprocessed
retail marijuana from the retail marijuana cultivation facility to a retail
marijuana product manufacturing facility or a retail marijuana store.
(b) The fifteen percent tax rate specified in paragraph (a) of this
subsection (1) is the maximum tax rate that may be imposed pursuant to
this section. At any time on or after January 1, 2014, the general assembly
may, by a bill enacted by the general assembly and that becomes law:
(I) Establish a tax rate to be imposed pursuant to this subsection
(1) that is lower than fifteen percent of the average market rate of
unprocessed retail marijuana at the time that it is sold or transferred; or
(II) After establishing a tax rate that is lower than fifteen percent
pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), increase the tax rate to
be imposed pursuant to this subsection (1); except that in no event shall
the general assembly increase the tax rate above fifteen percent of the
average market rate of unprocessed retail marijuana at the time that it is
sold or transferred. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an
-15- HB26-1301

increase in the tax rate pursuant to this subparagraph (II) shall not require
voter approval subsequent to the voter approval required pursuant to part
4 of this article.
(b.5) THE FIFTEEN AND FORTY-TWO HUNDREDTHS PERCENT TAX
RATE SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION IS THE MAXIMUM
TAX RATE THAT MAY BE IMPOSED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. AT ANY
TIME ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY, BY
A BILL ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THAT BECOMES LAW:
(I) ESTABLISH A TAX RATE TO BE IMPOSED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (1) THAT IS LOWER THAN FIFTEEN AND FORTY-TWO
HUNDREDTHS PERCENT OF THE AVERAGE MARKET RATE OF UNPROCESSED
RETAIL MARIJUANA AT THE TIME THAT IT IS SOLD OR TRANSFERRED; OR
(II) AFTER ESTABLISHING A TAX RATE THAT IS LOWER THAN
FIFTEEN AND FORTY-TWO HUNDREDTHS PERCENT PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (1)(b.5), INCREASE THE TAX RATE TO BE IMPOSED PURSUANT
TO THIS SUBSECTION (1); EXCEPT THAT IN NO EVENT SHALL THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY INCREASE THE TAX RATE ABOVE FIFTEEN AND FORTY-TWO
HUNDREDTHS PERCENT OF THE AVERAGE MARKET RATE OF UNPROCESSED
RETAIL MARIJUANA AT THE TIME THAT IT IS SOLD OR TRANSFERRED.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AN INCREASE IN THE
TAX RATE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (1)(b.5)(II) SHALL NOT REQUIRE
VOTER APPROVAL SUBSEQUENT TO THE VOTER APPROVAL REQUIRED
PURSUANT TO PART 4 OF THIS ARTICLE 28.8.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection SUBSECTIONS (2)(b) AND
(2)(b.5) of this section, the tax imposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section shall not be levied on the sale or transfer of unprocessed
marijuana by a marijuana cultivation facility to a medical marijuana
-16- HB26-1301

center.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-28.8-305, amend
(1)(a)(III); and add (1)(a)(V) and (2) as follows:
39-28.8-305. Distribution of tax collected - definitions.
(1) All money received and collected in payment of the tax
imposed by this part 3 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall
distribute the money as follows:
(a) (III) For the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2019, and for
each state fiscal year thereafter except for the state fiscal year
commencing July 1, 2020, AND EXCEPT FOR ANY STATE FISCAL YEAR
COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026, all of the money received and
collected annually shall be transferred to the public school capital
construction assistance fund created by article 43.7 of title 22 or to any
successor fund dedicated to a similar purpose.
(V) FOR STATE FISCAL YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JULY 1,
2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL ANNUALLY TRANSFER THE ADJUSTED
MARIJUANA TAX REVENUE TO THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CAPITAL
CONSTRUCTION ASSISTANCE FUND CREATED BY ARTICLE 43.7 OF TITLE 22
OR TO ANY SUCCESSOR FUND DEDICATED TO A SIMILAR PURPOSE AND THE
DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE TOTAL MARIJUANA TAX REVENUE AND THE
ADJUSTED MARIJUANA TAX REVENUE TO THE HOSPITAL SUPPORT ACCOUNT
CREATED IN SECTION 24-75-302 (3.9).
(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "ADJUSTED MARIJUANA TAX REVENUE" MEANS THE TOTAL
AMOUNT OF TAX REVENUE THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN COLLECTED IF THE
TAX IMPOSED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION WERE IMPOSED AT A RATE OF
-17- HB26-1301

FIFTEEN PERCENT RATHER THAN FIFTEEN AND FORTY-TWO HUNDREDTHS
PERCENT.
(b) "TOTAL MARIJUANA TAX REVENUE" MEANS THE TOTAL
AMOUNT OF TAX REVENUE COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 39-28.8-307
as follows:
39-28.8-307. Revenue and spending limitations.
Notwithstanding any limitations on revenue, spending, or
appropriations contained in section 20 of article X of the state constitution
or any other provision of law, any revenues generated by the retail
marijuana excise tax imposed pursuant to this part 3 as approved by the
voters at the statewide election ELECTIONS in November 2013 AND
NOVEMBER 2026 may be collected and spent as voter-approved revenue
changes and shall not require voter approval subsequent to the voter
approval required pursuant to part 4 of this article ARTICLE 28.8.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-503, add
(1)(d.5) as follows:
44-3-503. Excise tax - records - rules - definition - repeal.
(1) (d.5) (I) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, IN ADDITION TO ANY
OTHER EXCISE TAX DESCRIBED BY THIS SUBSECTION (1), AN EXCISE TAX IS
IMPOSED AT THE RATE OF SEVEN AND THIRTY-THREE HUNDREDTHS CENTS
PER GALLON, OR THE SAME PER UNIT VOLUME TAX APPLIED TO METRIC
MEASURE, ON ALL MALT LIQUORS AND HARD CIDER, EIGHT CENTS PER
LITER ON ALL VINOUS LIQUORS EXCEPT HARD CIDER, AND SIXTY AND
TWENTY-SIX HUNDREDTHS CENTS PER LITER ON ALL SPIRITUOUS LIQUORS.
THIS EXCISE TAX MUST BE COLLECTED ON THE RESPECTIVE BEVERAGES,
NOT OTHERWISE EXEMPT FROM THE TAX, SOLD, OFFERED FOR SALE, OR
-18- HB26-1301

USED IN THE STATE.
(II) (A) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY
COLLECTED FOR PAYMENT OF THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
(1)(d.5) TO THE OLD AGE PENSION FUND CREATED IN SECTION 1 OF ARTICLE
XXIV OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 2 OF
ARTICLE XXIV OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION AND SHALL FURTHER
TRANSFER AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THIS AMOUNT FROM THE OLD AGE
PENSION FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 7 (c)
OF ARTICLE XXIV OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
(B) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER AN AMOUNT EQUAL
TO THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (1)(d.5) FROM THE
GENERAL FUND TO THE HOSPITAL SUPPORT ACCOUNT CREATED IN SECTION
24-75-302 (3.9).
(III) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY LIMITATIONS ON REVENUE,
SPENDING, OR APPROPRIATIONS CONTAINED IN SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X
OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION OR ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, ANY
REVENUE GENERATED BY THE TAX IMPOSED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (1)(d.5) MAY BE COLLECTED AND SPENT AS A
VOTER-APPROVED REVENUE CHANGE.
SECTION 10. Refer to people under referendum. At the
election held on November 3, 2026, the secretary of state shall submit this
act by its ballot title to the registered electors of the state for their
approval or rejection. Each elector voting at the election may cast a vote
either "Yes/For" or "No/Against" on the following ballot title: "Shall state
taxes be increased by $44 million annually by a change to the Colorado
Revised Statutes modifying existing law and creating new law that
concerns taxes on certain harmful substances, and, in connection
-19- HB26-1301

therewith, increasing the tax on the sale of malt liquors, vinous liquors,
spiritous liquors, hard cider, and retail marijuana dedicating that tax
revenue first to the construction and operation of the Colorado Mental
Health Institute at Aurora and then the operation of long-term civil
commitment facilities in Mesa County, and authorizing the state to keep
and spend the additional taxation revenue as a voter-approved revenue
change?" Except as otherwise provided in section 1-40-123, Colorado
Revised Statutes, if a majority of the electors voting on the ballot title
vote "Yes/For", then the act will become part of the Colorado Revised
Statutes.
-20- HB26-1301